Agency Legend Corp Counsel = Corporation Counsel (Law Department) CJC = Criminal Justice Coordinator DCAS = Department of Citywide Administrative Services DDC = Department of Design and Construction DEP = Department of Environmental Protection DoITT = Department of Information Technology and Telecommunications Domestic Violence = Office to Combat Domestic Violence DOE = Department of Employment DOT = Department of Transportation EDC = Economic Development Corporation FDNY = Fire Department of New York HHC = Health and Hospitals Corporation HPD = Housing Preservation and Development HRA = Human Resources Administration Intergov = Intergovernmental Affairs LMDC = Lower Manhattan Development Corporation MTA = Metropolitan Transit Authority MOHIA = Mayor's Office of Health Insurance Access NYPD = New York Police Department OEM = Office of Emergency Management OLR = Office of Labor Relations OMB = Office of Management and Budget PPI = Public Private Initiatives PSRC = Penn Station Redevelopment Corporation SBS = Small Business Services February 10, 2003 Dear Fellow New Yorkers: During my campaign for Mayor, I released a series of proposals on major issues - ranging from improving education to enhancing innovation to building our economy to strengthening law enforcement - that would make our city a better place.
These were the ideas I campaigned on, and in large part, they're the reason I was elected.
Now that I have completed my first year in office, it is only appropriate to look at those proposals and see how effective my administration has been in executing them.
You have a right to know what I said I would do in the campaign, and you have a right to know what I have done about them as Mayor.
That's what accountability is all about.
Every promise I made during the campaign, whether we have achieved it thus far or not, is listed in this database for your review.
As we progress, I will continue to update this list so you know where we stand.
Of the 380 proposals made during my campaign, 80% have either been implemented, launched or will be launched in 2003.
Approximately 15% remain uncompleted - often due to the budget constraints facing our city - and an additional 5% were ideas that we seriously considered and eventually decided weren't the best way to proceed.
Many of the proposals implemented, launched or planned for 2003 are in the traditional areas of education, health, economic development and public safety: the cornerstones of our city's strength and well-being.
But many others revolve around concepts and ideas that aren't all that familiar to city government: improving customer service, implementing new technology, and bringing state of the art practices and ideas into the public arena.
These are the principles that will make us the most innovative, effective, efficient and responsive city this nation has ever seen.
The goal of a public official shouldn't be to escape scrutiny and review.
We should embrace it, because the more the people hold us accountable for results, the better we'll do.
That has been my experience in over thirty-five years in the private sector.
Now I'm doing my best to make it the standard in the public sector.
New York City's best days are yet to come.
This is one more way to make sure we get there.
Sincerely yours, Mike Bloomberg Mike Bloomberg Printer Friendly Format (in PDF) Campaign Accountability Statement.
Michael R. Bloomberg, Mayor, City of New York Promise Agency Description/Update Status Create a business advisory group to improve the existing information hotlines to make them user-friendly Aging Aging formed the Taskforce for Older New Yorkers, an ad-hoc committee established to proved feedback regarding all of Aging's services and programs.
Members of the Taskforce are service providers, academicians and gerontologists.
Aging also combined all customer service numbers into one hotline: 212-442-1000.
Done Create a multiple-listing service for insurance programs, elder housing, nursing homes and home care services offered by the private sector to seniors Aging Aging developed a program that compares rates and makes them available in several ways, including a hotline, direct outreach to seniors, and the web.
Done Educate seniors about their rights under the City's Human Rights Law Aging Displayed at senior centers and on Aging's home page: nyc.gov/aging.
Done Have one citywide automated hotline for seniors with multiple-language directions regarding service locations, program existence and eligibility Aging Aging consolidated all of its call centers (over twenty) into a single number: 212-442-1000.
In 2002, the number averaged 20,075 calls per month.
Done Implement the Uniform Benefit Assessment System to determine senior eligibility for all government programs and offer a single, simplified application for all city, state and federal benefits and entitlements Aging The QuickCheck system (an improved version of UNIForm) is now available on the web.
QuickCheck is an easy to use benefit screening tool that can screen quickly and allows users to access and complete benefit applications online.
Done Make the Uniform Benefits Assessment System user-friendly for seniors and widely available at all senior centers, libraries, and community centers Aging The UNI-form can be installed at any community-based organization, and QuickCheck is currently available through the web.
Done Join the "Cities for Climate Protection" campaign and inventory and forecast key sources of carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases DEP The City has joined the Cities for Climate Protection campaign.
Cities participating in this voluntary program will develop a plan to reduce green house gases.
In Summer 2002, the City drafted the first inventory and by early 2003, the final report will be ready for an announcement.
Done Purchase additional land upstate, create more buffer zones between roads, buildings and streams, adhere to smart growth concepts through sustainable building practices, further utilize conservation easements facilitated with a donor tax credit, and advocate for elimination of threatening building subsidies in order to protect upstate reservoirs DEP DEP added over 15,000 new acres in 2002 and will resolicit thousands of acres in the Catskill and Delaware watersheds in 2003.
DEP programs also maintain and protect buffer zones by enforcing new regulations about any construction within 100 feet of a watercourse in the watershed.
The Watershed Agriculture Program and the enforcement of watershed regulations are examples of smart growth concepts.
Conservation easements are provided through tax credits for property owners.
DEP constantly monitors potential development near the watershed to assess the impact on the water supply and is an active participant in the debate over each project.
Additionally, the Filtration Avoidance Determination signed in November, 2002 (between the City and the EPA) will allow the City to avoid building a filtration plant that would cost $5 billion to $6 billion.
Done Make all relevant information available to the court at the earliest possible moment.
Domestic Violence, CJC, NYPD Delivering digitized 911 tapes to arraignments and labeling some defendants as chronic misdemeanants on their rap sheets (through Operation Spotlight) has helped accomplish this (for example, Operation Spotlight has shown that 20% more defendants are being held on bail).
Done Introduce congestion pricing for parking meters DOT DOT has expanded congestion pricing for commercial vehicles in midtown through muni-meters.
The muni-meters limit double parking by commercial vehicles, generate new revenue, and improve traffic flow.
Done Use technology, including cameras, to facilitate pedestrian and vehicle flow DOT, DoITT Technological innovations that deal with pedestrian and vehicle flow include Morning Drive Live (which includes 22 real time cameras), new traffic cameras, EZ Pass readers for data collection through Transcom, and new LED international pedestrian signals.
DOT is piloting the Interagency Incident Management System (a City 
Done Create an agency for debt issuance related to the recovery effort EDC Debt was issued through the Industrial Development Authority, which is also being used to administer the Liberty Bond program.
Done Provide SBA loans and small cash grants from foundations to help small businesses EDC EDC awarded more than 12,000 Business Recovery Grants of $460 million to small businesses, along with $17.7 million in Small Firm Attraction and Retention Grants.
These grants were only given to businesses south of Canal Street, helping reduce occupancy costs significantly.
Done Develop a credible and comprehensive needs assessment that demonstrates why New York City needs and requires Federal and State assistance EDC, Intergov EDC created a "sources and uses" model for Lower Manhattan that details costs and existing funds to demonstrate the City's needs.
The model was used to help develop the Mayor's plan for rebuilding Lower Manhattan.
Done Abolish the Board of Education Education The school governance agreement led to mayoral control.
Done Create special classrooms and monitors to attend to disruptive children while social workers and teachers attempt to alter the disruptive student's behavior Education Students committing repeated serious infractions will be assigned to newly created "twilight schools" that are being established in each borough.
Students who commit the most serious infractions will continue to be assigned to an expanded program of Second Opportunity Schools.
Done Make the Chancellor and Superintendents accountable with their jobs on the line.
The same goes for principals Education The Chancellor, Superintendents and Principals are all held accountable with their jobs on the line, especially through the new, streamlined system of accountability and the Principals' Report Card.
Done Provide an across-the-board salary increase for teachers Education The latest teachers' contract provided a pay raise for all teachers.
Done Support the implementation of age-appropriate HIV/AIDS curriculum in grades K-12 Education Education administers the AIDS curriculum mandated by the State.
Done Support the office of the Special Commissioner of Investigation for the city's schools Education Done through appointment of Richard Condon.
Done Continue supporting the legal process to get New York City's fair share of state funds for schools.
Education, Intergov The City has strongly supported the suit, including submitting an amicus brief in its favor.
Done Install cameras in school stairwells and common areas to handle discipline problems and combat abuse Education, NYPD Cameras have been installed in stairwells and common areas in schools across the five boroughs, and more will be installed this year.
Done Give Health the resources to assure a 24/7 ability to accept and analyze reports of unusual diseases and outbreaks and respond to any emergency Health Health syndromic surveillance monitors the occurrence of groups of symptoms seen in emergency department visits as an early detection system for outbreaks 24/7.
Done Increase the City's focus on preventive medicine and integrate clinical preventive services with prevention in the schools, home and community Health A new Division of Health Promotion and Disease Prevention was created in 2002, and a neighborhood initiative was established in Bushwick and East Harlem to partner with schools, day care providers, medical providers and housing establishments.
During the flu vaccine campaign, the neighborhood initiative facilitated flu vaccination in communities where vaccine uptake remains low.
Plans are also underway to promote colon cancer screening, improve diabetes management and the use of "public health detailers."
Done Maintain the City's commitment to protecting clinics from violence, threats and harassment Health Health Police patrol all clinic facilities.
In the past year, medical abortion services were begun in a Maternal Infant Care clinic in one facilty, and increased security was provided.
Done Make tuberculosis detection and treatment a routine part of the City's clinic programs Health Health has renovated its 10 Chest Centers.
These state-of-the-art facilities provide high quality, free, confidential care to prevent or treat tuberculosis, regardless of ability to pay or immigration status.
Done Stop the City-initiated assignment of Medicaid-eligible women to plans which do not provide reproductive care Health While the City does not assign medicaid enrollees, 16 of the 17 plans with which the City contracts provides these services (the one exception is Fidelis, which does not offer these services.
However, their members receive state-directed outreach that let them know how they can still go about receiving these services).
Done Complete installation of PACS HHC PACS (picture archiving communications system, meaning x-rays) are now digitized and doctors can view them at any time from any on-line location.
Done Computerize HHC's medical records HHC All ordering (test, prescriptions) is now done on computers and on-line.
This includes the computerized physician order entry (CPOE) of test results, allergies, patient history, treatment plans and clinical documentation.
Every doctor also now has an email address and the doctors communicate electronically.
Done Integrate medical residency training in abortion care into the HHC network of OB/Gyn programs HHC All HHC OB/Gyn residency training programs have pregnancy termination training.
Staff training and capital improvements are also being done in locations that offer abortions.
Done Establish a community garden policy HPD, Corp Counsel, Parks New agreement dictates which gardens will remain and which will be used as housing (198 went to Parks, 153 will be developed for housing).
Done Change administration of the Family Responsibility Act so that those leaving welfare do not have their Medicaid automatically terminated HRA Medicaid now continues upon the closure of a public assistance case (receiving Medicaid and receiving public assistance are no longer automatically linked).
By mid 2003, the period of coverage will be expanded to allow continuation of services and coverage and to afford consumers the opportunity to continue Medicaid Only coverage through mail renewal.
Done Create a legislative distinction between the economic effects of a one-time terrorist attack and profligate spending so that the Financial Control Board is not triggered in all instances Intergov In 2001, the State legislature subsequently provided the New York City Transitional Finance Authority with $2.5 in additional borrowing capacity to finance expenses after the September 11 attacks, $1.5 billion of which was used to close the FY03 budget gap.
Done Lobby the City Council to add "transgender" to the City's human rights law Intergov This bill was passed by the Council and signed by the Mayor (Local Law 3 of 2002).
Done Lobby the State to pass the Sexual Orientation Non-Discrimination Act Intergov This bill passed the legislature and was signed by the Governor.
The Mayor aggressively lobbied for this through State Legislative Affairs.
Done Perform on-going environmental monitoring for as long as Fresh Kills houses the structural remains of the World Trade Center.
Intergov The EPA performed environmental monitoring when Fresh Kills was in use.
Done Push for mandatory child safety trigger locks on guns purchased in New York City Intergov This was accomplished through local legislation in 1999 and is now being enforced.
Done Remove IRS restrictions on refunding tax-exempt debt Intergov The City was given the ability to issue one additional advance refunding of certain debt, creating savings of $150 million.
Done Hold an international design competition to determine what to do with Ground Zero LMDC, EDC Seven design teams made up of many of the world's most accomplished architects, designers and city planners unveiled their designs for the World Trade Center site on December 18.
The LMDC has since narrowed the field to two plans.
Done Aggressively promote public-private partnerships Mayor's Office The City has developed a number of new public-private partnerships ranging from Education's hiring of Caroline Kennedy and the creation of an office to bring in private resources to private funding for the September 11th anniversary to private funding to restore Gracie Mansion and City Hall to revamping the City's Public-Private Initiatives office.
Done Appoint a Deputy Mayor to solve the housing crisis.
Mayor's Office Deputy Mayor Doctoroff oversees the implementation of the Mayor's plan to create 65,500 new units of housing.
Done Bring top business leaders into City government to serve in official and advisory capacities Mayor's Office This has happened on both levels, ranging from hiring major Wall Street leaders for top positions in the Mayor's Office and EDC to bringing in business leaders like Jack Welch to serve in an advisory capacity (Welch serves as Chair of the Advisory Board of Education's Leadership Academy).
Done Create an open office plan in City Hall Mayor's Office The creation of the bullpen in City Hall meant placing the Mayor, Deputy Mayors and most key Mayoral staff in one room.
Done Disband the Decency Commission Mayor's Office The terms of the members of the "decency commission" expired in November 2002.
The Cultural Affairs Advisory Commission, established in 1976 to help promote culture in New York City, will be revived.
Done Do not re-open the Fresh Kills landfill Mayor's Office The Fresh Kills landfill remains closed.
Done In the event of a vacancy in the Mayoralty, hold a special election in sixty days Mayor's Office The issue was put to the voters in November 2002 and passed with 61% of the vote.
Done Ride mass transit to work Mayor's Office The Mayor regularly rides mass transit to work and to other meetings and events.
Done Support an independent CCRB Mayor's Office The Mayor supports the independent CCRB, which is fully functioning and was given the right to prosecute by a recent decision by the Appellate Court (upholding the lower court's decision).
Done Support the charter proposal to establish the Mayor's Office to Combat Domestic Violence Mayor's Office The proposal passed in 2001.
The Office to Combat Domestic Violence is fully up and running, and has introduced a host of new initiatives.
Done Protect City employees from the hazards of second hand smoke Mayor's Office, Health The Mayor's smoking legislation makes virtually all workplaces smoke free.
The bill takes effect on March 30, 2003.
Done Endorse the "Ask Campaign" sponsored by PAX.
Mayor's Office, CJC The City sent letter to PAX endorsing the campaign and is working with PAX on other public safety initiatives.
Done Curb privileged parking Mayor's Office, Corp.
Counsel Working with the State Department, the Mayor's Office and Corporation Counsel resolved the long-standing diplomatic parking dispute.
Foreign nations with outstanding tickets and fines have begun to pay their debts.
Done Increase private healthcare options for small businesses through HealthPass MOHIA Options increased from 20 to 26 in 2002 (each option is a set of benefits offered to individuals), with dental, long term disability coverage, and life insurance options added.
In 2002, HealthPass had a 81% increase in the number of employer groups it serves (56% of employees in Health Pass are new and 64% of groups are new, meaning they didn't participate the year before).
Done Continue the NYPD's all-out war on illegal guns NYPD New gun safety initiatives include doubling the reward for arrest of illegal gun carriers, reinvigorating the cash for guns program, creating the Bronx Gun Investigation Unit, expanding the Firearms Investigation Unit, developing a new initiative with ATF to bring more federal gun cases, and tracing illegal firearms to source states to identify the traffickers for federal prosecution.
The Mayor's Office and NYPD are currently working on a new set of gun safety initiatives for 2003.
Done Continue to bring down crime NYPD In 2002, crime declined by an additional 5%, placing New York City between Provo, Utah, and Rancho Cucamonga, Calif. in terms of its crime rate per 100,000 people.
Done Continue to require posting police statistics on the Internet NYPD Crime statistics are posted on the Police Department's homepage: nyc.gov/nypd and are accessible to the public.
In addition, certain quality of life neighborhood statistics are now available on nyc.gov.
Done Continuously review, upgrade, and increase firearm and police training NYPD The Tactical Village opened this year at the Rodman's Neck facility in the Bronx.
New heavy weapons curricula have been developed and offered to members of the Emergency Service Unit, Intelligence Division, Aviation Unit, Headquarters Security, various security details, and for Fire Marshals.
Heavy weapons qualified Firearms and Tactics Section personnel were deployed to One Police Plaza and the Office of Emergency Management.
Done Crack down on double parking NYPD The Police Department issued nearly 700,000 double parking summonses through 2002 for double parking.
Done Do everything possible to recruit the best men and women for the NYPD, including improving minority recruitment by going to African-American and Latino places of worship and community organizations, recruiting more young people for the NYPD Cadet Corps program, allowing recruits to submit their applications through the Internet, and creating a pro bono ad committee to recruit new officers NYPD In March 2002, the NYPD On-Line Application System was instituted, making the NYPD the first City agency to accept on-line exam applications.
Nearly 35,000 applications have been received.
The NYPD also established an external Recruitment Advisory Board, which was responsible for revamping recruit advertising and securing national advertising gratis.
The NYPD is sending recruiters to non-traditional schools and institutions to generate bigger pool of applicants, and established three, no pre-registration examination sites.
In 2002, 27,280 candidates were tested.
Done Do everything possible to stop poaching by suburban police departments NYPD Ongoing efforts to enhance training, improve officer safety, acquire greater resources and technology, and strengthen the professionalism of the uniformed service are all designed to enhance the NYPD's status and desirability.
The NYPD also implemented an initiative to allow senior members of the service considering retirement to retain and bank variable supplement pay on a yearly basis.
Done Ensure that training reinforces or even increases the level of professionalism NYPD The In-Tac training program for in-service officers was redesigned to include first-responder and counter-terrorism training topics, and the Omniform Complaint System requires training for all members at all Department levels.
During 2002, 1,927 members of service have been trained in arrests processing; 2,515 were trained in data entry; 542 supervisors were trained in signing off; and 90 members of service were trained in troubleshooting.
Done Ensure the NYPD retains command and control of School Safety Officers.
The Gang Unit officers should train School Safety Officers on warning signs of gang activity NYPD All School Safety Officers are under the command of the Department's School Safety Division, headed by an Assistant Chief.
School Safety Officers receive training on a routine basis from the Department's Gang Division.
The Gang Division monitors gang activity in schools and has also designated a senior officer to serve as its School Safety Liaison, responsible for coordinating all information pertaining to City schools.
The School Safety Division also takes part in weekly strategy meetings held by the Gang Division.
Done Expand and continue the Community Notification Protocols NYPD The Community notification roster, used in the dissemination of critical information to the community, is continually updated by NYPD Community Affairs.
Done Procure new non-lethal weaponry NYPD The NYPD's Emergency Service Unit acquired, tested and modified non-lethal equipment on an ongoing basis throughout 2002.
Done Require precinct commanders to provide monthly written reports on community meetings and be held accountable for their response to community concerns NYPD NYPD implemented a procedure that requires commanders to forward a report to the Police Commissioner immediately following a community meeting indicating the issues raised and the steps that will be taken to correct the condition.
Done Use technology to allow cops to process arrests at the station house rather than central booking NYPD Most arrests are now processed directly.
Done Develop new quality of life initiatives NYPD, CJC Operation Clean Sweep, Operation Spotlight, Operation Neon Light, and Operation Silent Night were all launched in 2002.
The STOP initiative and Operation Impact were launched in 2003.
The smoking ban in workplaces takes effect on March 30, 2003.
Done De-brief a greater percentage of those arrested to determine whether crimes were gang related NYPD, Correction The debriefing of arrestees for gang-related activities, regardless of their offense, is a standard part of procedure.
Correction's Gang Intelligence Unit also conducted more than 31,000 debriefings in 2002.
Done Develop significant counterterrorism measures NYPD, Intergov A major counterterrorism program has been developed and implemented by NYPD.
The City is also lobbying for greater share of Homeland Security funds from the federal government.
Done Ensure that healthcare provider and not government personnel see patients first in cases of bioterrorism OEM, Health The policy is for patients to be seen by healthcare providers immediately.
In addition, over the past year, Health has strengthened bioterrorism preparedness including a major renovation of the bioterrorism lab, federal grants to hire new staff, and a new Emergency Preparedness Bureau to coordinate public health resources in cases of bioterrorism.
Done Permanently establish a joint bio-terrorism task force with leaders in the healthcare field, medical school personnel, infectious disease specialists, community leaders and city, state and federal officials OEM, Health The taskforce was established.
Four bioterrorism tabletop exercises included participants from most of these fields.
Health also created a Weapons of Mass Destruction advisory expert group that brings together experts to review emergency protocols and to help with planning.
Done Institute a hiring freeze OMB The City instituted a hiring freeze in November 2002.
Done Use any future operations surpluses to pay down the accumulating long-term debt burden, reducing debt service, and establishing a rainy day fund.
OMB The City will have a surplus in FY03 that will be used to reduce next year's debt service.
Done Provide an across-the-board salary increase for teachers, police and firefighters OMB, OLR Salary increases for all three groups occurred through collective bargaining agreements.
Done Continue Partnerships for Parks Parks Partnerships will unveil second round of catalyst programs to create new community adoption and partnership of major neighborhood parks in 2003.
Done Create Bloomingdale Park Parks In December 2002, the Mayor announced the creation of $17 million for Bloomingdale Park and new parks facilities.
Work on the new park has begun.
Done Dedicate special events fees in parks to the agency's budget Parks In 2002, Parks collected nearly $2 million from corporate sponsorship.
That funding went to the City's general fund.
Parks then received $1 million extra in funding and $1 million was credited against budget cuts.
Done Find asphalt areas appropriate for artificial turf to alleviate the shortage of ballfields Parks Though operation "Green Acres," Parks installed nine synthetic turf fields in 2002 and plans to install 21 more in 2003.
Done Work with community groups to clean and water Greenstreets Parks To date, 252 Greenstreets have been adopted.
Parks plans to expand the program in 2003.
Done Inventory city-owned and tax delinquent property for park use Parks, DCAS Parks acquired 14 acres of City-owned property in 2002 and expects to acquire 65 more acres of City-owned property in 2003.
Done Avoid inappropriate placement by working with health professionals to review decisions with seniors considering a change of residence Aging Aging issued 11 contracts in 2002 to caregivers of patients suffering from Alzheimer's Disease or related dementia who may need a change of residence.
The contracts require the information, referral services, counseling and maintenance services to help avoid inappropriate placements.
Launched Centralize the purchasing of paper products and other standard-use items for senior centers Aging Since most Aging purchasing is done by the groups who operate senior centers, Aging is working on centralizing outside group purchasing.
Launched Create a motor vehicle insurance pool to take advantage of group rates for senior center vans Aging Aging is collecting insurance data from senior centers and other transportation related programs to develop a pool of programs to seek group rates.
Launched Develop and implement performance based contract monitoring for all organizations receiving contracts for senior services Aging Performance based contracts do not exist systemwide, but performance based contracts do exist in the areas of case management, home care, social adult day services, and legal contracts.
Launched Expand crime prevention and crime victim assistance programs to thwart elder abuse Aging A federal grant was awarded to train NYPD, EMS, and DA's on elder abuse issues.
A new state grant was used to create 76 training workshops in English, Spanish, Russian and Chinese to teach seniors how to spot financial abuse and consumer fraud.
Launched Expand outreach for and education about available senior services through community centers, faith based institutions, on TV and radio, and through public service announcements in easy-to-understand language Aging Aging sponsors and participates in a wide variety of conferences, roundtables, seminars, and workshops.
Aging also coordinates a series of health and wellness forums throughout the City to educate seniors regarding aging services and issues.
Initiatives to expand public awareness through venues like Crosswalks are also underway.
Launched Increase coordination with the Dept. of Youth Services so that teenagers eligible for work-study can use their time assisting seniors Aging The Intergenerational Work Study Program integrates academic study with community service.
Aging also participates in the Department of Youth Services Interagency Council.
Launched Work with community-based organizations to tailor senior services to the needs to New York's new immigrant communities Aging Aging has launched a number of initiatives to do this, including the creation of a Hindu senior center, and a new center at 100 Gold Street which targets Asian seniors.
Aging also has centers that serve populations with specific dietary needs, services that include information and literature presented in various languages including Russian, Chinese, Spanish and Korean, and simultaneous translation of general sessions of Aging's Alzheimer's Conference.
Launched Work with SAGE, the Pride Senior Network, and the Council of Senior Centers and Services to raise awareness of the special needs of gay seniors Aging Aging has begun enhancing services for gay seniors, including increased interaction with PRIDE and SAGE.
Two members of SAGE were appointed to the Senior Advisory Council.
PRIDE leadership served on a panel for a workshop regarding the needs of LGBT seniors suffering from Alzheimer's.
Launched Provide prevention and intervention services to victims of elder abuse Aging, Domestic Violence Aging has contracted for the first time with community-based organizations to provide elder abuse prevention services at community centers throughout the five boroughs.
The programs provide supportive counseling and training in financial protection, legal referrals and violence prevention.
Nine contracts citywide have been awarded.
Launched Continue City funding for the development of affordable assisted living facilities Aging, HPD Aging funds services to seniors who reside in Naturally Occurring Retirement Communities.
Aging is also establishing a committee to identify funding sources and promote the building of senior housing and awareness of the tax abatement benefits available to developers of senior housing.
Launched Institute an Adopt-a-Senior Center program by matching companies to senior centers Aging, PPI Aging is establishing an Adopt-a-Senior Center program, beginning with a partnership with Stockamp Associates.
Aging is working on this with the Council of Senior Centers and Services and City Meals on Wheels.
Launched Appoint a Blue Ribbon panel of experts to find ways to upgrade building codes and eliminate special interest obstacles that increase development costs Buildings Buildings formed an industry advisory panel to give upfront input on initiatives being planned.
A commission was also formed to study feasibility of adopting the National Model Code (e.g. the International Building Code).
The commission was formed in November 2002 with recommendations due in April 2003.
Launched Increase computerization to ease filings of building plans Buildings The Building Information System on nyc.gov allows anyone to review the status of their building plans, on line, at home, without having to travel to a Buildings office.
Buildings is now working on a plan to allow filing of building permit applications and plans on-line.
Launched Re-engineer the Dept. of Buildings, including more computerization to ease filings of building plans, reviewing the Buildings Code, instituting a standard of timely reviews and sign-offs, and providing consistent interpretations of the Buildings Code Buildings Restructuring of Buildings is underway, including new anti-corruption measures (spot audits, integrity training, new disciplinary actions, new focus on audits with DOI), code revisions (National Electrical Code, national model code), new technology (BIS on nyc.gov), and new public safety measures.
Buildings is also working on a plan to allow building permit applications and plans to be filed on-line.
Launched Review City building and electrical codes and the zoning resolution to encourage green building construction and sustainable design Buildings Buildings is participating in a public-private initiative to support sustainable design.
The initiative is focused on removing barriers that make sustainable design too costly and difficult to pursue on a widespread basis.
This is also an initiative being pursued by the forthcoming Energy Policy Office.
Launched Upgrade building codes to reduce development costs Buildings Buildings adopted and implemented the National Electrical Code and is studying the adoption of other national model codes.
Computerization of certain forms, electronic access to applications, electronic filing, and anti-corruption measures are expected to decrease costs.
Launched Invest more in the oversight of capital projects DDC DDC is doing this through new initiatives including a new GIS project management system, a post-construction survey and database to measure client satisfaction and highlight areas where DDC needs to improve, detailed template project schedules with additional construction milestones to enhance DDC's current project management system, and creating a central repository for all DDC project, contract and payment information on the agency's intranet.
Launched Build redundancy into the water supply system DEP The capital planning for water main work throughout the City consistently builds redundancy into the design.
In 2002, DEP spent approximately $100 million on water main work and plans to spend another $100 million in 2003.
In addition, construction has commenced on the Manhattan leg of the Third Water Tunnel.
The actual tunneling commences in February 2003 and the first phase (60th Street to the Holland Tunnel entrance) is scheduled to be finished by the end of 2004.
Work is proceeding on the Brooklyn - Queens leg of the tunnel, shaft sites are being constructed to bring the water from the tunnel to the distribution system at the street level, and major construction for the distribution system is continuing in Brooklyn.
Launched Connect the former Jamaica Water Supply customers to the City's water supply system DEP DEP has been removing Jamaica Water System wells from service to ensure that residents of southeast Queens receive high quality water.
A major study is also ongoing in southeast Queens called the Brooklyn - Queens Aquifer Study to reduce the volume of the groundwater table while cleansing the contaminated wells that are now off-line.
Launched Continue analyzing the scope of the damage to the Delaware Aqueduct and devise a plan for repair DEP DEP is performing directional drilling at the location of suspected leaks in the Delaware Aqueduct, which will permit an assessment of possible locations of the leak by running tests parallel to the tunnel in the ground.
The final work is being done at Woods Hole Oceanographic Institute (WHOI) on the Autonomous Underwater Vehicle (AUV).
The AUV was recently launched into the Rondout -West Branch tunnel and will travel a distance of 45 miles.
The AUV, equipped with sophisticated sensors and 5 digital cameras, will record almost 200,000 digital images.
The data will be assessed, giving DEP a clearer picture of the leak's location and helping DEP produce a repair strategy.
Launched Explore connecting the areas served by the Croton water supply system with the Catskill/ Delaware system DEP This is being studied by DEP.
There already are many interconnections between the two systems.
Launched Study the source of pollution and devise strategies to remedy the damage being done to area waters through sewage overflow DEP To stem the impact of combined sewer overflow and storm runoff, DEP developed the Urban Watershed project, building upon the upgrade and construction of our wastewater treatment plants.
The goal is to increase water quality in 26 specific bodies of water throughout the City.
Plans will include a waterfront access component for each waterbody.
Launched Upgrade security throughout the watershed and at critical water transport junctures DEP DEP launched a $70M program to increase security, and DEP Police staffing increased by 50% in 2002.
DEP also created the first Environmental Police Academy.
In January 2003, DEP created several new specialized units to increase surveillance and protection opportunities, including a Special Operations Group, a Scuba Unit, a Canine Unit, and an ATV/Bike Unit.
Launched Explore filtration of the Croton Reservoir DEP DEP has submitted three sites for filtration of the Croton Reservoir and will make a final decision at the end of April 2003.
Launched Learn more and track city utilities using modern technology DEP, DoITT DEP is mapping sewer and water lines.
Con Ed is mapping power lines.
These utilities are being electronically mapped to NYCMAP: a digital base map based on aerial photography of the city that is being used to align all infrastructure features and location data.
Launched Clean and develop soiled lands scattered throughout communities in partnership between the City and the community DEP, HPD, EDC DEP will provide developers with information to help them determine the economic viability of potential projects, including whether it is necessary or feasible to participate in the State's Voluntary Cleanup Program.
The City has created a Brownfields taskforce to collect agencies' "best practices," and will then work with the state to codify those practices.
Launched Support proposed state legislation that spells out a Brownfield clean-up policy geared to the intended use of the property and also defines liability and assigns risk DEP, HPD, Intergov, Parks, EDC The legislation referred to did not pass, so the City is now attempting to accomplish this administratively through its new Brownfield remediation taskforce.
The City has created a Brownfields taskforce to collect agencies' "best practices," and will then work with the state to codify those practices.
Launched Set emission reduction goals, plan for, monitor and quantify actions to reduce pollutants DEP, Intergov This is mostly done by State DEC, but DEP is working on noise pollution standards.
For noise pollution, DEP is in the process of finalizing the first major overhaul of the New York City Noise Code since 1974.
The first phase will be ready in early 2003 and the final portion by the end of 2003.
The revision will use new acoustic technologies and standards to gauge noise in an urban setting that are currently outdated in the present law.
This is also part of Operation Silent Night.
Launched Advertise and enforce the ban against idling of motor vehicles DEP, NYPD NYPD uses Operation Matinee to prevent idling.
Every Wednesday in the theater district, officers aggressively move motorists who are illegally parked.
DEP responds to complaints about vehicle idling at specific locations.
In areas where vehicle idling occurs repeatedly, DEP will do enforcement sweeps.
In 2003, DEP will also use signage to reduce idling and has a new program to reduce school bus idling.
Launched Partner schools with high-tech and other industries to determine the best course of training to provide needed, skilled workers DOE, Education Education worked with the State to certify several programs in City schools so that graduates receive Regents diplomas as well as vocational diplomas.
DOE has a program that trains youth to become micro-computer support specialists.
DOE also recently initiated a public-private partnership to implement the Information Technology Career Ladder Consortium, which trains youth and adults in careers in technology fields.
Launched Repeatedly address the importance of a strong work ethic in our schools, universities and among our unskilled potential workforce DOE, HRA Each of DOE's youth employment programs focuses on developing a strong work ethic.
In 2002, over 120 programs served 65,000 youth, citywide.
In addition, HRA distributed over 8,000 educational vouchers in 2002, allowing public assistance recipients to receive skills based training.
Launched Inventory broadband infrastructure, identify potential service gaps and ensure adequate supply, using sewer lines, water lines and underground conduits to provide connectivity DoITT The City's fiber infrastructure is being comprehensively mapped.
DoITT is working with the City's cable and high-capacity telecommunications franchisees to electronically map their fiber infrastructure, utilizing GIS technology.
DoITT issued an RFP to permit companies to construct lateral fiber conduits so that broadband connections could be used more widely and efficiently.
This should significantly reduce capital costs for businesses and telecommunications carriers, alleviate reliance on existing copper connections to a single central office, result in fees for the City, and minimize the number of street cuts for building connections.
DoITT also released an RFP for the conversion of an obsolete system of underground water pipes into telecommunications conduits.
Launched In cases of domestic violence, consolidate referral services and resources in one place Domestic Violence Domestic Violence is consolidating services for victims into one place.
It is currently being tested as a pilot program in the Bronx (46 Precinct) and Brooklyn (67 Precinct), with possible expansion in 2003, including using intake points for victims' cases in addition to cases from NYPD.
Launched Seek ways to increase the capacity of the domestic violence shelter system and explore alternatives to the shelter system Domestic Violence Domestic Violence's alternatives to shelter program provides services directly to the household so the victim doesn't have to leave, including a personal alarm and home security devices.
2003 expansion is now being studied.
Launched Use technology as video conferencing, can link the court with collateral services so a judge knows whether a defendant is attending addiction counseling or so the judge can refer a victim to appropriate services Domestic Violence This idea has been tested in Brooklyn for drug court cases and is now being explored for domestic violence cases.
Launched In cases of domestic violence, have a Criminal Court judge and a Family Court judge readily and simultaneously accessible to help women obtain child support and pursue domestic violence complaints Domestic Violence, CJC Judge Kaye has a pilot program on this in the Bronx.
She is considering possible expansion.
The Criminal Justice Coordinator has offered the City's assistance.
Launched Establish a sustained program for infrastructure management of bridges, tunnels and roadways.
DOT DOT has a program to sustain bridge, tunnel and roadway infrastructure.
16 bridge projects and 22 roadway projects were completed in 2002.
Launched Evaluate restrictions on under-occupied motor vehicles DOT DOT worked with NYS DOT to upgrade a bus lane on the LIE to 3+.
The HOV lane on the Gowanus was also changed to 3+.
Launched Expand the congesting pricing commercial vehicle parking program DOT Congestion pricing for commercial vehicles has expanded, mostly in Midtown.
DOT has installed 345 muni-meter machines and has collected over $2 million in revenue from muni-meter cards.
Launched Move towards a bike friendly and pedestrian friendly environment to foster alternatives to motor vehicles DOT DOT has added bike lanes in a number of locations including, Avenue C (Manhattan), University Avenue (Bronx) and Clinton Street (Brooklyn).
A bike lane has also been added to the Williamsburg Bridge.
For pedestrians, 30 midtown intersections have split phasing.
Newsracks legislation, effective February 24, will enable DOT to remove newsracks that impair pedestrian crossing.
Launched Use crosswalk marking to stop parking where pedestrians are blocked and drivers' vision of approaching cars is impaired DOT DOT has increased the number of intersections that are day lighted.
Examples include Thru Streets intersections, several pilot programs in Staten Island, and an increased number of high visibility crosswalks.
DOT is also working with the MTA on a bus stop marking program.
Launched Create more ferry service to, from and around Manhattan DOT, EDC Brooklyn ferry service was created after 9/11 and will be maintained at least through early 2003.
More service to Long Island City and Hoboken was also created with FEMA assistance.
The Upper East Side now has ferry service to Lower Manhattan.
Construction of the West Midtown Ferry Terminal (Pier 79) begins in mid-February.
Launched Slowdown speeders to protect pedestrians by implanting LED lights in the roadway, let drivers know how fast they're going, and install cameras to catch speeders DOT, Intergov DOT placed 9 speed indicators on Queens Boulevard.
The City is pursuing legislation that would permit the usage of mobile speed cameras that provide information on vehicle speed.
Launched Create additional bus lanes on major roads DOT, MTA The Fordham Road Bus lane and Church Street Busway were created in 2002.
DOT is identifying additional new bus lanes on major roads.
Launched Continue the fight for equitable distribution of services and funding at JFK and LaGuardia EDC EDC is negotiating with the Port Authority.
Launched Expand oversight of money being spent to rebuild Lower Manhattan to combat corruption and waste EDC The LMDC has established a program to do this.
Launched Focus on industries other than financial services in Lower Manhattan EDC EDC, along with McKinsey 
The Mayor's vision for Lower Manhattan includes a wholly diversified economy, and to date, of the 68 companies that have accepted September 11 related grants, half of those companies are not financial services companies.
Launched Persuade New York City companies to commit to having a greater percentage of their employees in New York City two years from now than they do today EDC EDC is using an analysis performed by McKinsey 
This will be used as an international road show in 2003, visiting companies that do not have operations in New York City, to explain the city's value proposition.
Launched Ensure that businesses comply with the terms of their tax incentive deals, including imposing penalties for businesses who breach these agreements, and require some form of bonding, insurance or a reserve fund to guarantee that performance standards are met.
EDC EDC is enforcing the provisions of its incentive deals including all appropriate penalties.
Where appropriate, the City requires security related to penalties.
Launched Survey high-tech companies to determine their needs and evaluate tax incentive programs aimed at them before funding is renewed.
EDC EDC is developing a sector-based approach with industry experts.
As a part of this, the City is reevaluating current incentive structures.
Launched When it comes to offering companies tax breaks, engage in a comprehensive review of the City's tax structure, develop a mechanism for evaluating and benchmarking program effectiveness, and eliminating programs which are not working.
EDC EDC is attempting to ensure that tax breaks are only given in cases where the effectiveness of doing so clearly benefits the local economy.
Launched Generate $25 billion in tourism revenue by greater promotion and advertising EDC The creation of the NYC Permanent Host Committee will help bring events to New York and promote tourism, as should major events like the 2004 Republican National Convention, the Grammys and the pursuit of the 2012 Olympics and the Super Bowl.
The creation of the City's Chief Marketing Officer to promote and coordinate will also help significantly.
Launched Lobby the NFL to hold the Super Bowl in the New York City area.
Lobby Major League Baseball, the National Basketball Association and the National Hockey League to hold their All Star games in New York City.
Lobby the NCAA to hold the Final Four in Men and Women's Basketball in New York City EDC Super Bowl lobbying is fully underway (a final decision by the NFL will be made in October 2003).
The City has not lobbied yet for the MLB, NBA or NHL All Star games yet, but the WNBA All Star game will be held at MSG.
Madison Square Garden is not equipped to handle Final Fours (but if we get the Olympics in 2012, the new facilities would be).
Launched Build large-scale shopping malls in the outer boroughs EDC, Planning The Gateway Center is a major new shopping center in East New York, as is the Charleston Center on Staten Island.
Forest City Ratner Companies is developing a 335,000 square foot retail complex at Atlantic Terminal in Brooklyn.
Launched Integrate community planning and economic development so we build what communities want and need EDC, Planning Work is underway to strengthen regional business districts like Downtown Brooklyn, Jamaica, and the Hub in the Bronx with input from Planning, EDC, SBS, other City agencies and the community.
Also, EDC has overhauled its RFP process to reflect the need for more community outreach.
Launched Support the work of Friends of the High Line to transform the elevated track into a park EDC, Planning, Parks A Mayoral commission was appointed to study feasibility of turning the High Line into a park.
In December 2002, the City filed for a "Certificate of Interim Trail Use" for the High Line from the Surface Transportation Board.
Launched Redevelop Penn Station EDC, PSRC The Farley Building was purchased by State and will be ready for conversion in Fall, 2004.
It will also be used as the media center for the 2004 Republican National Convention.
Launched Continue to support the development of parent-initiated charter schools and hold those schools to the same standards as other public schools Education Education has created a charter schools office to begin doing this.
Specific new support for charter schools will increase significantly in 2003.
Launched Do not allow any students to graduate until they master the ability to read, write, use arithmetic and develop interpersonal skills Education The Regents exams, which tests English and Math, moves to 65% for passing, up from 55%.
The newly launched Office of Youth Development and School Community Services will work with schools, teachers and principals to help students develop interpersonal skills.
Overall, Mayoral policy has ended social promotion.
Launched Do not close schools at 3 pm Education New afterschool programs, mandated by the No Child Left Behind Act, mean that schools will stay open later to offer more services to students.
Launched Ease the process of student enrollment for out of district schools Education New procedures are being implemented to comply with No Child Left Behind Act, in which parents who apply will be notified of their children's transfer before the end of the school year.
The anticipated deadline for completed parent requests is mid-May 2003.
Launched Encourage more public-private partnerships to make after-school programs accessible to all public school children Education The No Child Left Behind Act requires this and Education developing new partnerships and programs to implement it.
Launched Establish School Leadership Teams at every school and make them accountable to principals Education All schools are required to have (and do have) School Leadership Teams.
Education is reviewing them to see exactly what they do and how they can do better.
Launched Find ways to bring in parental voices other than through ineffective Community School Boards Education The school governance agreement led to elimination of the boards.
The Mayor announced the hiring of a Parent Coordinator in every school, the creation of Parent Support Offices, and the creation of a Parent Academy.
Newly created Parent Engagement Boards, consisting solely of parents, will have input into evaluation of Regional Superintendents and Local Instructional Supervisors and monitor effectiveness of Parent Coordinators and Parent Support Offices.
Launched Get more teachers into the classroom by moving them out of administrative posts Education Education is doing this by moving teachers from district offices into schools, especially in the areas of math and reading.
Launched Integrate school services with other social services provided by City and private providers Education Education created the Office of School Safety and Planning in partnership with NYPD, and a new partnership with Health to coordinate all student health services.
Launched Make students accountable for their behavior with zero-tolerance for disruptive behavior and violence in the schools Education The new program dictates that students will be required to sign a new student behavior contract that will also have to be signed by their parent or guardian in a parent conference for committing minor infractions of disorder in the classroom, ensuring that parents and guardians have a role in the student's discipline process.
Students will be given visible, supervised in-school service assignments, such as graffiti removal.
For non-violent but serious infractions, students will continue to be re-assigned to enhanced in-school suspension centers for a period of several days to get them out of the classroom.
For committing repeated more serious infractions, students will be assigned to newly created "twilight schools" that will be established in each borough.
Students who commit the most serious infractions will continue to be assigned to an expanded program of Second Opportunity Schools.
Launched Move administrative services out of overcrowded schools to make room for students Education Classrooms currently used as offices and conference facilities will become classrooms again and the centralization of operational students will produce 8,000 classroom seats (the equivalent of 12 new schools).
Launched Pursue all routes to recruit teachers, including loan forgiveness and housing allowances Education 8,000 new teachers were certified in 2002.
The New UFT contract provided pay raises for new teachers and the registration process for teachers was streamlined.
Ongoing meetings with Commissioner of the State Education Department are intended to ease the certification process.
Launched Recognize and reward success by establishing charter districts that would have freedom from bureaucratic meddling.
Eligible districts would have the authority to purchase services, with savings going to that district.
Education The entire school network has been reorganized into ten districts and the top performing 200 schools are not required to use the standard curriculum.
Procurement and purchasing policies for the entire school system are being overhauled to save money and reduce waste, with the savings going directly into the classroom.
Launched Support the full implementation of the "New Continuum" of services for Special Ed students Education Program implementation is underway.
In addition, Mayor Bloomberg has charged Chancellor Klein with reexamining how to provide effective services to students with special needs.
Launched Take better advantage of federal funds for maintenance and repair of schools available through programs like the Schools Facilities Infrastructure Improvement Act Education The new school construction office is working on this.
Launched Use citywide and state-required tests to regularly measure student performance Education In accordance with No Child Left Behind, the State will take over all high stakes testing within 5 years.
Currently, City and State exams regularly test English and Math in grades 3 through 8 and 12.
Launched Change construction regulations so schools in New York City cost the same as elsewhere Education, DDC The merger of SCA and DSF is aimed at accomplishing this.
One major goal of the project is bringing down cost per square foot.
Launched Provide funds for school-based eye and ear testing and other preventive healthcare Education, Health 173,000 students received school based eye and ear testing in 2002.
The Mayor created a joint office coordinating Education and Health activities to provide better health services for students.
Launched Give teachers more control over how they teach.
Education, OLR The 200 top performing schools will be allowed to operate more freely (choosing curricula, training, teachers).
The remaining schools will follow a more systemwide standardized approach to reading, writing and math.
Launched Have school-based merit pay determined by performance Education, OLR The CSA contract awards bonuses for principals based on achievement.
Education announced bonuses for superintendents based on achievement and other factors, and bonuses for principals who turn around failing schools.
Merit pay is not given to teachers.
Launched Streamline the process for firing bad teachers.
Do not warehouse them in District Offices for years Education, OLR The new teachers' contract contains provisions that establish an arbitration panel that must set aside monthly hearing time with strict deadlines and no adjournments to ensure that teacher discipline hearings are completed in a timely fashion.
The average time to complete teacher hearings is expected to decrease from 20 months to 5 months as a result.
Launched Equip all fire trucks with computers that give firefighters the evacuation plans and blueprints of buildings while en route to burning buildings FDNY FDNY is currently compiling this information in a binder so they have the information while en route to fires.
The next step is digitizing the information and putting them on computers on each truck.
At the same time, FDNY is also seeking funding for a wireless command station to be used at fire scenes, which would provide electronic access to information including building plans (would include any digital information that exists and whatever comes on-line).
The RFP to do this will be released in Spring 2003.
Launched Implement the co-op/condo tax abatement program Finance Finance has implemented the program and it has been extended by the State Legislature through 2004.
Launched Enhance Health nutritional education efforts Health Health has launched several nutrition initiatives in 2003.
The Worksite Wellness program promotes healthy choices in vending machines and in cafeterias in nearly 100 worksites throughout the city.
The Senior Wellness Project conducts nutritional workshops at senior centers.
In addition, Health is working with Education to promote healthy choices and educational materials in the schools.
Launched Give the School Health Program the staffing, funding and services it needs to safeguard our kids against contagious diseases and needless illnesses Health Health and Education have a new office to coordinate student health services and improve preventive care in all areas.
Launched Insist that all managed care providers that offer CHIP offer coverage to Medicaid recipients so parents can go to the same providers as their children Health Health has recommended to the State Department of Health that health plans that offer Child Health Plus also offer Medicaid coverage (ultimately, it's a state decision).
Launched Provide asthma prevention education and services for students Health The Asthma Initiative has increased capacity for asthma prevention in schools by providing funding for the Open Airways program, an asthma education program that targets children with asthma in elementary schools.
The Asthma Initiative has also developed an asthma-safe school guidebook, and is working in several schools to educate school staff, parents, and children about asthma.
Launched Provide training and support for parents of children with asthma Health Parent workshops are conducted at schools, shelters, community centers, daycare centers, foster care agencies, and other community sites.
Referrals, information and support for parents is available by calling the Asthma Initiative's toll free number 1-877-ASTHMA-0, and case management services for families of children with asthma is available through community contractors in high-risk neighborhoods.
Launched Reduce the disparity in infant mortality among communities through neighborhood interventions Health Health has contracts with 30 community-based organizations in various communities to promote family planning, reduce smoking during pregnancy, promote breast-feeding, and educate families on ways to minimize the risk of Sudden Infant Death Syndrome.
The infant mortality rate fell by 9% in 2001.
Launched Support the "Quit Yet" anti-smoking campaign Health Health has supported this in multiple ways.
In November 2002, Health convened a first-ever citywide cessation summit.
Participants included representatives from HHC clinics, unions, private insurance companies, Medicaid managed care companies, private cessation programs, and employers.
In addition, Health is working with HHC to increase outreach and improve cessation services for HHC's 14 cessation clinics.
Launched Undertake research on pollutant control, especially in neighborhoods with high incidence of mercury, lead and mold contamination Health Mold inspections increased by 42% in FY02 and lead poisoning cases decreased by 13%.
Launched Provide uniformity and consistency in citywide data from Health and HHC to perform analyses on comparable data Health, HHC Health and HHC created a joint task force to prioritize, staff and troubleshoot various data sharing activities.
These activities include improving methods of sharing birth and death registry information, analyzing syndromic surveillance, and providing mutual technical assistance (Health shares quality assurance indicators with HHC and HHC shares clinic productivity measures with Health).
Launched Develop a database of basic demographic information about the uninsured to facilitate marketing and outreach efforts for Health Stat Health, MOHIA The first ever Community Health Survey of 10,000 New Yorkers generated citywide data to drive information-based public health decisions, target programs more efficiently, eliminate unsuccessful projects, and provide more information on-line for the public.
MOHIA will use this information for marketing and outreach.
Launched Focus on keeping children connected to CHIP including follow-up to ensure that families are taking advantage of their coverage Health, MOHIA Health enrollers advise all families they enroll into Child Health Plus, Medicaid and Family Health Plus on how to access health care services in managed care plans and how to take advantage of their coverage.
HRA is implementing streamlined procedures like mail-in recertification to make it easier for families to enroll.
MOHIA is launching a new program to perform outreach in conjunction with adult literacy programs.
Launched Make health programs available to immigrants regardless of how they got here Health, MOHIA Health and MOHIA enroll children in Child Health Plus regardless of immigrant status.
They also enroll immigrant adults into Medicaid and Family Health Plus consistent with New York State law.
MOHIA also assures immigrants that their children are eligible for CHIP and are not at risk, regardless of their immigration status.
Launched Enforce prohibitions against sales of tobacco products to under aged children Health/ Consumer Affairs The list of "Filthy Fifty" vendors was released by Consumer Affairs and fines were assessed.
Consumer Affairs constantly monitors tobacco sales to under aged children.
Launched Organize current clinics, diagnostic centers, and commercial centers into an easily understood and accessible network of community-based clinics HHC HHC redesigned ambulatory care operations in July 2002.
Patients, in many facilities, can now make appointments with their primary care providers at a date and time of their choosing and complete the visits within 60 minutes.
Within three years, that will be the case at all clinics.
Launched Pursue bulk purchasing of medicine HHC HHC receives deep discounts from federal government's Public Services pricing structure and is supporting federal legislation that would allow hospitals to obtain PHS pricing for inpatient pharmaceuticals.
HHC also uses multi-state group purchasing organization contracts to save money, and participates in the pharmacy prime vendor program.
This has kept HHC's rise in pharmacy costs to 4.5%, compared to 13.5% for the industry at large.
Launched Rationalize HHC's healthcare delivery system and concentrate specialty services in specific facilities so that the overall system can focus on primary care and trauma HHC HHC is now organized into seven geographically and operationally linked expansive health care networks each including multiple acute care hospitals, long-term care facilities, skilled nursing facilities, diagnostic and treatment centers, rehabilitation centers, behavioral health programs, and numerous on-site and off-site medical and behavioral health clinics.
This has resulted in improved continuity of care, cost savings, increases in efficiency and staff productivity and cross-subsidization of facilities and services.
HHC will continue to consolidate services across networks or on a borough basis and make referrals, whenever possible, to other HHC facilities.
Launched Build affordable housing at higher density and refuse to grant tax incentives unless developers take full advantage of the maximum number of units and density allowed by zoning HPD Developers are currently taking full advantage of zoning and maximum density laws to build maximum capacity.
However, new zoning laws will help this happen on an even greater scale.
Launched Seize and transfer buildings cited for serious code violations whose owners do not make the required repairs HPD Buildings are being seized and transferred (seized for code violations and transferred for tax delinquency).
Launched Survey vacant and underutilized structures and make the list available on the Internet with an eye toward conversion into affordable housing HPD City-owned vacant and under-utilized structures are already on the web (the private sector efficiently disseminates information about available non City-owned vacant and under-utilized structures).
Much of the underutilized property is a result of zoning or Brownfield issues which the Mayor's housing plan addresses.
Launched Work with the AFL-CIO pension operators to invest in office and housing construction in NYC in return for Project Labor Agreements HPD The AFL-CIO investment was announced in January 2002.
HPD is now working with the AFL-CIO to find projects they can invest in.
Launched Increase the number of housing units by at least 100,000 HPD, Planning The Mayor's housing plan will produce at least 65,500 new and renovated affordable units.
New zoning regulations will lead to greater growth.
Launched Eliminate the required face to face meeting between beneficiaries and caseworkers for recertification HRA This is done in certain cases (like when the funding is for a child only) instead of the face to face meeting (generally by phone).
This goes hand-in-hand with lengthening the recertification process, where certain groups are moved off the rolls and onto specialty groups.
HRA is also planning a mail renewal program for 2003.
HRA also aggressively lobbied the State to streamline its food stamp application process (which resulted in the application being shortened to 4 pages, down from 20).
In addition, an interagency taskforce was formed to improve information flow between social service agencies and streamline procedures, including sharing case management information and eligibility data, and using the same technology across city agencies.
Launched Lengthen the time needed to recertify beneficiaries to two years HRA All non-cash assistance Medicaid recertifications are now conducted by mail, eliminating the face to face requirement for about 500,000 families.
HRA has proposed lengthening the recertification period for non cash assistance Medicaid cases composed of children only to two years.
This will require a federal waiver.
The 135,000 Supplemental Security Income Food Stamp Recipients now have a two year recertification cycle for their mail reverts.
Launched Use qualified WEP workers for senior homecare programs and develop a training program so these WEP workers can leave the program for unionized jobs as homecare workers HRA In FY02 (and FY03 through December 2002) over 500 individuals receiving public assistance were trained via HRA Employment programs as Home Attendants.
In calendar year 2002, over 2,100 job placements recorded for people on public assistance were as Home Attendants.
Launched Aggressively track those who have gone off welfare to see what programs work HRA, Mayor's Office HRA and the Mayor's Office are working with the Urban Institute to see how individuals are able to retain jobs and what factors foster or impede retention.
Launched Allow any registered NYC voter to circulate any candidate's petition to any voter Intergov State Legislative Affairs has written to the State Assembly and Senate Chairs of the Elections Committee to express the City's interest in passing this legislation, and will be meeting with the Chairs to discuss.
Launched Allow more independents and third party members to serve as election inspectors Intergov State Legislative Affairs has written to the State Assembly and Senate Chairs of the Elections Committee to express the City's interest in passing this legislation, and will be meeting with the Chairs to discuss.
Launched Convince the federal government to assist the City in protecting our critical infrastructure and paying for security personnel and technology Intergov The federal government provided $21 billion in assistance in response to September 11, including tax incentives geared towards creating economic activity in Lower Manhattan.
The President has proposed $3.5 billion in homeland security funds, nationwide, but Congress has not yet passed it.
NYPD, FDNY, OEM, HHC, and Health are actively lobbying for $900 million of it.
Launched Convince the State to redirect tax incentives to facilitate the development of mixed-use construction and rehabilitation Intergov The 421(a) program was extended by the State, but the Council has not yet acted on the extension.
The Council did recently make amendments to the program that would expedite benefits when the property has been rezoned.
Launched Encourage the passage of legislation in Albany to amend the New York City Relocation and Employment Assistance Program (REAP) to help businesses willing to relocate to areas other than Manhattan below 96th Street Intergov REAP expires in 2003.
State Legislative Affairs is working on amendments that would prolong the program.
Launched Explore voter registration via the Internet through changing state law Intergov State Legislative Affairs has written to the State Assembly and Senate Chairs of the Elections Committee to express the City's interest in passing this legislation, and will be meeting with the Chairs to discuss.
Launched Lobby for the City's fair share from the State to maintain state roads within the city Intergov The City has lobbied to increase the funding provided for the costs of arterial maintenance, since the current level of funding from the State is insufficient to cover the City's fair share of the costs.
Launched Lobby the federal government to increase the Medicaid reimbursement rate and support the state takeover of non-federal Medicaid costs.
Intergov The Senate passed an increase of FMAP in the last Congress, but it will have to be taken up again this year.
This is a major part of the City's federal legislative agenda.
The City has been actively lobbying the State to cover Medicaid costs and reduce the City's Medicaid related expenses.
Launched Make absentee ballots easier to obtain Intergov State Legislative Affairs has written to the State Assembly and Senate Chairs of the Elections Committee to express the City's interest in passing this legislation, and will be meeting with the Chairs to discuss.
Launched Seek salaries and overtime costs associated with events surrounding September 11 Intergov This is part of the package of City requests for increased federal aid.
Launched Support federal legislation to include senior prescription drugs, eyeglasses, dental and hearing aid benefits as part of Medicare Intergov The City is requesting that the Medicare program include a drug benefit, which would benefit seniors significantly.
Launched Support repeal of the Wick's Law Intergov The City is actively supporting its repeal.
Launched Support state takeover of all non-federal Medicaid costs so that no county or city will be forced to pay for Medicaid eligible residents Intergov The Mayor called for increased state payments on Medicaid during his budget address and State Legislative Affairs is actively lobbying for it.
Launched Continue rent stabilization and rent control protections and introduce local legislation to continue the rent stabilization and rent control laws after April 1, 2003 Intergov, Aging This is expected to occur in 2003.
The City Council has to pass a bill and a declaration of housing emergency by April 1, 2003, and the State must then act by June 30, 2003.
Launched Push for completion of the $4.3 billion East Side Access project bringing the LIRR to Grand Central and the completion of the Second Avenue Subway Intergov, DOT The City is pushing for both as part of reauthorization of TEA-21 in the 108th Congress.
DOT is actively lobbying the New York Congressional delegation.
Launched Lobby the State to pass the "Dignity for All Students Act" Intergov, Education Education has drafted a memo in support of the legislation.
Launched Encourage voluntary contributions to the parks through the use of a check off system on State and City income tax filings Intergov, Parks Senators Velella and Maltese have introduced a bill that would create a income tax check-off system for New York City residents with funds going to an urban forestry fund.
The City issued a memo in support in 2002 for a similar bill.
Launched Transfer Gateway National Park back to the City or insist that the National Park Service increase funding and care Intergov, Parks Parks has reached out to the National Park Service to talk about ways to work together to improve Gateway's condition, and the Mayor's Office will be reaching out to the NPS as well.
Launched Appoint gay and lesbian New Yorkers to the CCRB and the bench of the Criminal and Family Courts Mayor's Office The Mayor's Office has appointed New Yorkers who reflect the city's diversity to the bench and throughout the administration.
Candidates are not asked about his or her sexual orientation during interviews, however, there is significant diversity in the CCRB.
Launched Create a Deputy Mayor for Youth Services to coordinate all areas affecting children Mayor's Office Deputy Mayor Walcott oversees almost all agencies who deal with children, including and especially Education.
Launched Introduce a customer service mentality to the city's workforce Mayor's Office The creation of 311 and introduction of a host of technology and programs to improve customer service -- including a wide variety of functions traditionally only offered in-person onto the web -- is helping to accomplish this.
Launched Push the Boy Scouts of America to drop its ban on gays in the Scouts Mayor's Office The Mayor met with New York Council of the Boy Scouts of America to lobby for this.
Launched Turn Gracie Mansion into a "Blair House" for visiting dignitaries Mayor's Office Gracie Mansion has been fully renovated with private funds.
Tours are available to the public, and the City is working on plan to use it to house visiting dignitaries.
Launched Open Government Help Centers in all five boroughs to bring together federal, state and city services.
Have them issue permits, licenses and approvals and allow them to function as ready-made Emergency Command Centers for any disaster.
Provide desks at the Government Help Centers for all public officials, municipal labor unions, and other public service agencies to provide as many services as possible in one location.
Provide linguists in popular local languages at each Government Help Center and keep the Centers open from 7 am to 7 pm, seven days a week Mayor's Office, DCAS, OEM DCAS is exploring possible locations.
The Mayor's Office is evaluating which agency functions can only be performed in-person to determine the scope of the Help Centers and to determine whether additional functions can be placed on-line.
Launched Create a "311" telephone number for all city services Mayor's Office, DoITT Phase 1 of 311 is about to be launched.
This includes the consolidation of 11 call centers and the creation of a database to house information on thousands of available city services.
311 will allow callers to access all non-emergency City services and speak to a live operator 24 hours per day.
Call center representatives will have access to translation services in 170 languages.
Callers outside the five boroughs will be able to dial 212-NEW-YORK to reach the call center.
The first phase of 311's multi-year implementation is scheduled to be operational in the first quarter of 2003.
In Phase One, callers will receive three main types of services: directory assistance, information requests, and full service requests.
Following the initial launch, each new phase will include additional content and service provision capabilities and will result in the consolidation of additional agency call centers and hotlines.
Launched Build a major high school and university complex on Governors Island in partnership with one or more private universities Mayor's Office, EDC The City and State received control of Governors Island in February 2003.
CUNY is working on a plan to create a major research center on the island.
Launched Lobby for modernized voting machines, including touch screen computers Mayor's Office, Intergov Federal legislation was passed and signed to change standards, but money to purchase new machines still needs to be provided.
The City is lobbying the federal government for funding for the modernized machines.
Launched Use case-based tracking systems to improve productivity and service delivery Mayor's Office, OMB A new system and program is being created to track case management and service delivery.
Launched Open City Hall Park Mayor's Office, Parks City Hall Park has been almost wholly reopened to the public.
Access to City Hall itself has also been improved significantly (tours of the renovated Governor's Room are now available to the public).
Launched Make CHIP (Child Health Plus) more accessible, streamline the application process, overhaul the recertification process and inform undocumented workers that their participation in CHIP and other programs will not expose them to risk of deportation MOHIA The City has lobbied the State to streamline both the application and recertification processes, and a number of these changes were enacted as part of the Workforce Recruitment and Retention Act.
In November 2002, HRA implemented a mail-in recertification process for Medicaid that utilizes a simplified, pre-printed recertification form (previously Medicaid recipients were required to re-certify in person).
In April 2002, the Mayor signed Local Law One, which requires 17 City agencies to distribute a brochure making consumers aware of the availability of public health insurance options.
The brochure included relevant eligibility information for immigrants.
Launched Continue to use schools to provide information about CHIP, including at back to school nights, parent-teacher conferences, and PTA meetings MOHIA, Education MOHIA works with Education to provide insurance information to parents.
In 2002, MOHIA began outreach and enrollment at pre-registration days.
In 2003, MOHIA will expand outreach to children registering for universal pre-k and is seeking private funding to create an incentive program for schools with the highest number of uninsured students to provide insurance information and enrollment opportunities.
Launched Create a transportation hub at the West Side rail yards linking the No. 7 line, LIRR, Metro-North and Amtrak MTA Funding is provided in the MTA's current capital program for the Environmental Impact Statement needed for the extension of the No. 7 line to the West Side.
The Environmental Impact Statement for Metro-North Penn Station Access is also almost complete.
The creation of the hub is a centerpiece of the Mayor's plan to redevelop the Far West Side.
Launched Create plans for bus depots and layovers to reduce emissions in overburdened areas of the city MTA The MTA is adding or reconstructing four depots including the Michael Quill Depot in Manhattan, the Coliseum Depot in the Bronx, the 100th Street Depot in Manhattan and the Grand Avenue Depot in Queens.
These four facilities will accommodate 925 buses and increase storage capacity by 386 buses.
Sites for new depots on Staten Island and Queens are also being explored.
Launched Improve subway signal systems and platform control to shorten the time between trains MTA The MTA is installing automatic train supervision and communications based train control to the signal system, and installing new public address/ customer information screens.
These initiatives tie into the MTA's Rail Control Center building, and their new fiber optics communications network, which is being expanded to every station.
New "step aside" signs and closed circuit television for train conductors are also being used to help reduce "dwell times" at heavily used stations.
Launched Post arrival countdown clocks on subway platforms, bus shelters MTA The MTA has an initiative to provide a centralized public address/ customer information screen system at 156 stations that would provide automated dissemination of real-time train information, including train identity and arrival time (the contract is being awarded in 2003 and will be completed in 2006).
Additionally, a separate contract is being awarded to install the system at 24 stations on the L line.
The MTA is also using global positioning systems to provide real-time bus arrival time at bus stops (however, this is not scheduled to be completed until 2009).
Launched Utilize Global Positioning Satellite technology to help bus drivers prevent "bus bunching."
MTA The MTA will issue an RFP in 2003 to use GPS technology to help improve dispatching, regulating intervals between buses and responding more quickly to service disruptions.
The initial phases will be complete in 2004, but systemwide completion will not happen until 2009.
Launched Extend the No. 7 line financed through Tax Incremental Financing MTA, EDC The environmental review of the extension of the No. 7 line has begun, as has preliminary engineering.
Extending the No. 7 line through Tax Incremental Financing is a key part of the Mayor's Far West Side plan and the City's 2012 Olympic bid.
Launched Have Gang Unit officers visit schools to talk about the dangers of gang and gun activity NYPD Two Sergeants who are assigned as Community Relations Liaisons provide briefings to administrators and teachers regarding gang-related issues.
School visits are also an integral part of the GREAT program (Gang Resistance Education and Training).
Launched Investigate the possibility of using the Internet to allow cops to earn credits toward promotion if they pass the courses.
NYPD NYPD and the Justice Department are discussing how to use the Police Academy as a new test bed for federally-supported distance learning that would include for-credit courses over the Internet.
Launched Preserve the NYPD's specialized units that investigate domestic violence, sexual assault and child abuse cases, but examine other specialized units to ensure they are being used effectively NYPD NYPD preserved the domestic violence units, is examining other units like warrants and narcotics, and eliminated the street crime unit.
Launched Provide laptops for all police officers ranking Captain and above and ensure the laptops can link to the CompStat database NYPD Laptops were provided to all Precinct, PSA and Transit commanders.
Launched Use teleconferencing and email to allow precinct commanders and One Police Plaza to communicate more efficiently NYPD 200 field locations have local area networks with internet addresses for the commanding officers.
This has not happened yet for teleconferencing.
Launched Explore expanding cameras in high-drug areas in a way that ensures civil liberties NYPD, Corp Counsel NYPD has CCTV in 15 housing locations throughout the city in order to protect our residents, and is attempting to get funding from the Housing Authority to expand to the program.
Launched Capture and download 911 calls onto a computer for later use as testimony NYPD, Domestic Violence NYPD will strengthen the ability of District Attorneys to prosecute domestic violence cases by giving them immediate access to high-quality digital 911 recordings.
The pilot program is being conducted in Brooklyn.
The program will be expanded citywide in 2003.
Launched Arm police with digital cameras and video equipment for cases of domestic violence NYPD, Domestic Violence Digital cameras were distributed to all precinct, housing, and transit commanding officers.
NYPD also expanded the "Digital Photographs Pilot Project" from Queens to Brooklyn.
Expansion of the precinct use of the digital photo transmission technology to the 67th and 72nd Precincts in Brooklyn will begin in early 2003, and will then be expanded.
Also, Domestic Violence is working on a new program to provide state-of-the-art cameras and computers to 11 City hospitals and treatment centers to document victim injuries for use in subsequent prosecution.
Launched Insist that gun owners undergo annual range training NYPD, Intergov NYPD is preparing legislation that would change the permitting process and training/ retraining process for gun owners.
Launched Rebuild an emergency citywide command center OEM The temporary command center has opened and the new center is being planned for Brooklyn.
Launched Increase the laboratory capacity in the City to reduce the time to obtain results and accommodate mass testing if needed OEM, Health Health is renovating its bioterrorism lab and also created a syndromic surveillance system to provide early warnings of possible bioterrorism.
Launched Reduce personnel costs through attrition, early retirement OMB Attrition and early retirement programs will lead to the reduction of 7,500 employees from the City workforce.
Launched Take advantage of tax laws that allow interest and depreciation deductibility for privately owned buildings.
The City should sell public facilities to private investors and lease them back OMB OMB is working on a transaction that would transfer City Water Tunnel #2.
Launched Carefully consider work rules during collective bargaining to increase productivity.
OMB, OLR The City is negotiating with each union on productivity gains.
Work rules are an important part of each negotiation on productivity.
Launched Pursue productivity gains through the workforce and reward them with benefits when productivity goals are met OMB, OLR The City is currently pursuing productivity gains with the unions.
Launched Clean Brownfields that can be used as parks Parks Brownfield remediation work is going on at three park sites in the Bronx including Barretto Point Park, the Edgewater Cement Plant Site, and Ferry Point Park.
Parks is also participating in DEP's Brownfields Taskforce.
Launched Develop a Greenway around Manhattan Parks Parks opened a new section on the Harlem River and an interim route will open in Summer 2003.
Parks is in discussions with SDOT, DOT, EDC, UN and City Planning on the next steps for completing the long-term route.
The cantilever section on the west side is in design.
Launched Ensure a presence in parks when people are there by having a second shift of workers on duty Parks The second shift program began in Summer 2002, with mostly Playground Associates and PEP officers.
Launched Expand the Greenstreets program Parks Parks built 8 Greensteets in 2002 and will construct around 25 in 2003.
Parks will also survey the number of remaining unplanted traffic triangles in the city.
Launched Initiate a pilot program to light designated fields with community input Parks As part of the design and renovation of every ballfield, Parks discusses the idea of lights with the community and installs them in cases where there is consensus and funding (for example, East River Park in Manhattan and Betsy Head Playground in Brooklyn).
Launched Inventory community gardens for preservation and convey those appropriate to a trust to assure their continued maintenance and development Parks 198 garden sites were designated for preservation in agreement.
In 2003, Parks will register and license every garden that meets certain criteria.
Launched Open all beaches and pools by starting lifeguard training in public schools, issue a lifeguard training guide so kids can exercise and work on their own time, encourage cops, corrections officers, firefighters and EMS technicians to take the lifeguard test and create flexible schedules so they can lifeguard, and recruit lifeguards in Southern Hemisphere countries Parks 37 foreign lifeguards were hired and deployed in 2002 (and a total of 984 in 2002, up from 904 in 2001).
Parks is currently pursuing H-2B visas to hire more lifeguards from the Southern Hemisphere.
Parks will also recruit PSAL swim team members.
Launched Set ground rules to protect parks from overuse by private entities and to determine qualifications for what payments should be.
Parks New permit fee quidelines have been drafted and are being reviewed with Corporation Counsel.
Launched Enhance nyc.gov/parks so it can handle complaints and requests from the public, allow the public to request tree pruning, stump removal, and graffiti removal over the site, and allow the public to view which ballfields are available and have the option of using a credit card to pay the permit fee Parks, DoITT All elements are complete except viewing available ballfields on line.
DoITT is working to delineate onto the City's basemap (NYCMAP) all recreation facilities including tennis courts, baseball diamonds, soccer fields, and basketball courts.
When this work is completed by July, 2003, Parks will be able to utilize these features on a map over the web to support on-line reservations and related applications.
Users can now purchase special event and tennis permits on-line with a credit card.
Launched Get more money from State and Federal Elected Officials Parks, Intergov For the first time ever, Parks staff has been dedicated to discussing budget issues with state elected officials.
In 2002, Parks met with 15 Senators and 49 Assembly Members and secured preliminary pledges of more than $2.7 million Launched Expand the Adopt-a-Park program, linking every park with a business, foundation or person who can offer financial support Parks, PPI Parks and Met Life have a five year agreement to maintain Greenstreets in Queensboro Plaza.
Parks is now working with other companies on similar proposals.
Launched Develop and articulate an alternative waste disposal policy in case any portion of the waste disposal system should fail Sanitation This is part of the City's new Solid Waste Management Plan, which would utilize and upgrade the existing Marine Transfer Station system to include containerization and waste compaction at each site (meaning the City will no longer rely on out of state processing or containerized facilities).
Sanitation is negotiating an engineering contract for the design of the Marine Transfer Stations to make them capable of containerizing waste.
Launched Grow the City's Business Improvement Districts SBS Five Business Improvement Districts (BIDs) are on track to be created in the fourth quarter of 2003: Forest Hills; Main Street, Flushing, and Sutphin Boulevard in Queens; 161st Street in the Bronx; and Madison Square in Manhattan.
Launched Mobilize all construction firms, particularly minority-owned firms, to participate in the rebuilding effort SBS SBS is working with the LMDC to adopt a strategy for providing opportunities related to rebuilding Lower Manhattan for minority and women owned businesses and local businesses.
Launched Open Satellite Business Centers SBS SBS will make business service resources more accessible and comprehensive by partnering with community organizations to open satellite centers in the Bronx, Brooklyn and Lower Manhattan in early 2003, and in Queens, Staten Island and Upper Manhattan in early 2004.
Launched Create policies that favor suppliers and employees who live in New York City SBS, DCAS, Corp.
Counsel SBS and the Law Department are working on an approach that would make this possible.
The new Satellite Business Centers should help increase procurement opportunities for locally owned businesses.
Launched Change the RFP process to make borough-wide Senior Centers serving the gay community eligible for funding Aging No RFP's have been issued this year (due to funding) but centers serving the gay community will be eligible when there are.
To Launch in 2003 Work with businesses to donate emergency beepers to seniors that link them to 911 hotline Aging Over 500 phones are being sent to Aging for seniors from Domestic Violence.
To Launch in 2003 Provide training for criminal justice personnel in elder abuse Aging, Domestic Violence Aging received a two-year grant from the Department of Justice to develop and implement a training curriculum for law enforcement officials and members of the criminal justice community.
This should help law enforcement and the criminal justice system recognize, investigate and prosecute crimes of abuse against seniors and the disabled elderly.
To Launch in 2003 Scan the victims' signed statement with respect to the abuse into a computer along with all other police reports CJC, Domestic Violence An electronic data set that would document abuse in domestic violence and all other cases (including domestic incident reports, digital photos and digitally recorded 911 calls) is being developed.
To Launch in 2003 Analyze government use of pesticides in schools, offices and hospitals and seek alternate methods of rodent and insect control DEP, Health Health is working with community organizations to teach residents about ways to eliminate pests from their homes with minimal use of pesticides.
Health has also been reviewing complaints of rodent infestations in City schools and will make recommendations on reducing their pest problems, focusing on improved containerization, rodent stoppage and the targeted and judicious use of pesticides.
To Launch in 2003 Get graduating high school students to participate in union offered training programs DOE, Education DOE is collecting and centralizing information on vocational educational training opportunities for high school students and will share it with the participants in the agency's 75 youth employment programs.
To Launch in 2003 Provide vocational education in skilled labor jobs to students in early high school years and remind dropouts they are not eligible for apprentice programs DOE, Education DOE is studying a targeted RFP for union-sponsored apprenticeship programs that would help high school students find skilled labor jobs.
To Launch in 2003 Develop more special senior programming on Crosswalks DoITT, Aging DoITT and Aging collaborated to produce a public service announcement (PSA), currently airing on Crosswalks NYC, describing the agency and the services available to seniors.
This information is also part of an audio track, "Crosswalk NYC Radio," which simulates the sound of a radio station and airs ads for City initiatives when callers are placed on hold at City offices.
This technology is currently in place in five locations.
Information regarding Aging and its services is currently running on Crosswalks' Digital Magazine.
DoITT and Aging are also collaborating on a series of programs under the working title of "The Emerging Issues for the Aging" which will highlight various issues of importance to seniors.
To Launch in 2003 Adopt a truck routing policy DOT A truck routing study has been initiated, looking at how to make routes more effective with new signs and education.
To Launch in 2003 Expand the use of cameras for traffic control and safety with "Area Under Surveillance" signs DOT, NYPD DOT has installed approximately 90 cameras to watch traffic.
Signs will be installed this year.
To Launch in 2003 Support environmental audits of select municipal departments and facilities, and identify ways to reduce the City's energy usage.
EDC The new energy policy office will be conducting environmental audits and surveys, including an energy efficiency inventory of all municipal buildings.
To Launch in 2003 Target new growth industries like biotechnology to grow near our hospitals and medical centers EDC EDC and the State are working on a regional biotech strategy that will be used to attempt to lure biotech business to the region in 2003.
To Launch in 2003 Upgrade existing generators to produce additional energy and minimize emissions EDC This is an integral part of the new plan to be launched by the energy policy office.
To Launch in 2003 Encourage parents in all school districts to solicit funds in their communities and/or from private companies for "extras" the city cannot afford like band instruments Education The new office of Strategic Partnerships is developing plans to bring in private sector funds for schools, including working with parents.
To Launch in 2003 Immerse students who do not speak English in the language Education Mayor Bloomberg has charged Chancellor Klein with developing a new curriculum for students who do not speak English.
To Launch in 2003 Increase the number of certified teachers by making it easier for certified teachers in other states to transfer their certification to New York Education Education is studying the certification process and will make proposals to the State on changing it.
To Launch in 2003 Institute voluntary bonus classes for children falling behind Education The No Child Left Behind Act requires after school and supplemental services for students in struggling schools who are falling behind.
This exists currently in some cases, and plans are being developed to implement this on a widespread basis.
Education is launching a new campaign to convince parents to take advantage of these services.
To Launch in 2003 Make logistical, back office support available for charter schools Education Currently, for charter schools, Education facilitates Special Ed services, provides food services and transportation, tracks/audits enrollment, provides information to parents, responds to parent complaints, provides monitoring, quality assurance around curriculum and outcomes, and facilitates testing services.
To Launch in 2003 Promote physical fitness in the schools and get more private companies to support sports, music and arts programs Education Education is developing plans to improve PhysEd programs, and its Partnerships office is looking at potential partners to promote athletics, music, and the arts.
To Launch in 2003 Use all measures to vigorously fight truancy Education Education's Office of School Safety is developing a plan to fight truancy.
To Launch in 2003 Institute a parents' voice mail system to provide grades, attendance, homework assignments, and special messages for their child from the teacher Education, DoITT In September, a pilot program will be initiated that provides voicemail boxes so parents can leave messages for teachers.
During the 2003-2004 school year, attendance information, grades and curriculum information will be available systemwide via the web and at Parent Engagement Centers.
Education, the UFT and CSA are also discussing ways to make homework and other information available via phone and the web.
To Launch in 2003 Empower communities to identify their problems by asking community groups to identify their public health priorities, providing timely access to data, creating a directory detailing available data, making comprehensive community health profiles available, and providing information about the City's programs in Spanish, French, Creole, Arabic, Russian and other languages Health Health will issue a series of 42 Community Health Profiles on the health of residents in New York City neighborhoods (7 in the Bronx, 11 in Brooklyn, 10 in Manhattan, 10 in Queens, and 4 in Staten Island) and focus on leading causes of illness and death, such as heart disease, cancer, diabetes, and asthma.
Data for the profiles includes information from the recently completed community health survey of 10,000 New Yorkers.
However, the profile is not available in all of the languages mentioned.
To Launch in 2003 Assemble vacant and under-used plots of land into larger sites for housing, including inventorying all vacant parcels HPD HPD is streamlining disposition of city-owned property and working with DCAS to expedite jurisdiction transfers, cancel leases, clear sites, and identify sites for residential and mixed-use development.
HPD is also working with NYCHA to use vacant or underutilized property for new housing.
Brownfield remediation and new zoning should also help make this happen for non-City owned land.
To Launch in 2003 Cease auctioning off vacant parcels and property that could become part of larger affordable housing development.
HPD Sale of City-owned vacant land will be coordinated through Deputy Mayor Doctoroff's office and City-owned land appropriate for residential development will be utilized for new housing development.
To Launch in 2003 Discourage warehousing of vacant land through regulations HPD Creation of "Venture Incentive Program" funds will clear the ground for construction of up to 10,000 units of new housing on former brownfields that now sit vacant.
To Launch in 2003 Evaluate vacant or under-utilized parcels for condemnation, demolition and assemblage while affording protection to occupants HPD This is happening through assemblage but not condemnation or demolition (the private market is generally efficient in properly evaluating land for potential development, provided the zoning regulations permit it).
HPD existing programs and lease and rent regulations offer occupants protection.
To Launch in 2003 Lease long-term publicly owned waterfront land for affordable housing HPD Waterfront land owned by the City or vacant and available for development after rezoning, remediation, disposing of city owned land and accelerated environmental review is part of the Mayor's housing plan.
To Launch in 2003 Target areas with obsolete non-residential buildings for conversion into housing HPD This is part of the zoning proposal in the Mayor's housing package, including accelerated environmental review and a Brownfield remediation strategy.
To Launch in 2003 Create waterfront housing zones, including moving non-marine dependent facilities from the waterfront HPD, Planning Waterfront land owned by the City (or vacant) and available for development after rezoning or remediation is part of the Mayor's housing plan.
Increasing property values will help encourage shift of other marginally productive, non-marine facilities away from waterfront, clearing more space for housing and parks.
A new local law requires an inventory of uses of waterfront property to figure out what doesn't need to be there.
Planning, in conjunction with the operating agencies, is looking for new sites for non-essential waterfront facilities like the West Side tow pound and the salt piles.
To Launch in 2003 Assemble city-owned land for private development to build large-scale housing developments, schools and hospitals HPD, Planning, HHC, Education A City taskforce, led by Deputy Mayor Doctoroff, was created to review City owned property (Parks, DOT, Education) for potential development.
To Launch in 2003 Simplify rules to obtain Medicaid coverage including adopting uniform eligibility standards for children and using existing databases to make it easier to enroll HRA HRA has plans to streamline the application process in 2003, including providing a primary HHC physician for each family.
To Launch in 2003 Lobby for a five-year capital plan with federal categorical aid to upgrade Health systems Intergov This is a part of the City's federal agenda.
Federal Legislative Affairs will lobby for the capital plan to upgrade Health systems this year.
To Launch in 2003 Provide a waiver for seniors who have trouble proving there were in the US before August 22, 1996 and whose family or clergy can verify their status Intergov This is a part of the City's federal agenda.
Federal Legislative Affairs will lobby for the waiver.
To Launch in 2003 Require all City agencies to have regularly scheduled programming relevant to seniors Mayor's Office In Phase 1, DoITT and Aging are developing new programming for seniors on Crosswalks.
To Launch in 2003 Sponsor an international architecture competition to create attractive waterfront housing Mayor's Office This idea is being actively explored by the Mayor's office.
To Launch in 2003 Create a mayoral taskforce on energy to facilitate communication among utilities, business and environmentalists Mayor's Office, EDC An energy policy office is being created and will be launched in February 2003.
To Launch in 2003 Computerize police reporting and communications NYPD IBM, Deloitte and Merrill Lynch taskforce surveyed the NYPD's technology needs.
The NYPD is developing a proposal to digitally photograph evidence and put it into the central evidence database.
To Launch in 2003 Give cops bar code scanners to scan the code on drivers' licenses NYPD This is under development by the NYPD's Parking Enforcement Unit.
To Launch in 2003 Increase remote database capability to allow cops to pull up more accurate and timely information on suspects NYPD NYPD will purchase and install 2,200 laptops in patrol vehicles and build a remote data warehouse.
To Launch in 2003 Use wireless laptops for filing reports in police vehicles NYPD Vehicles have mobile display terminals, which are about to be replaced with 2,200 new Panasonic laptops.
NYPD will install forms for filing reports once the laptops are installed.
To Launch in 2003 Give traffic agents hand-held summons devices or digital cameras to record parking violations NYPD, DOT NYPD completed a pilot program of parking ticket devices.
DOT has piloted using handhelds for HIQA construction inspections.
To Launch in 2003 Apply the loft-law concept to other industries, permitting individuals to work where they live Planning Legalizing illegal lofts would take state legislation, but through rezoning, Planning proposes to map mixed-use zoning districts or certain commercial districts in loft areas.
These districts permit up to 49 percent of a dwelling unit to be used home occupations, which is much more generous that the rules for purely residential neighborhoods.
Examples include Greenpoint, Williamsburg, and DUMBO in Brooklyn; Port Morris in the Bronx; and Hudson Square in Manhattan.
To Launch in 2003 Ensure that zoning and economic development decisions focus on mixed-use solutions, in tandem with changes to the transportation system.
Development should be encouraged in areas with transportation infrastructure to discourage unnecessary sprawl.
Planning Work underway to strengthen regional business districts like Downtown Brooklyn, Jamaica, and the Hub in the Bronx through integrated planning with Planning, EDC, DBS, other agencies and the community.
Each centers around areas with strong (though often underutilized) transportation infrastructure or potential new transportation infrastructure like the extension of the No. 7 train or connecting the LIRR to Lower Manhattan.
The plans include regulatory changes, public infrastructure investments, streetscape redesign and new open space to promote private investment in office and residential development.
To Launch in 2003 Overhaul land use regulations to reflect the current market Planning Planning is reviewing zoning rules to respond to changing land use, economic activity, and population patterns.
Planning issued a Strategic Plan in Spring 2002 outlining its agenda for neighborhoods like East Harlem, Hudson Square, City Island, Greenpoint, Williamsburg, Park Slope and North Corona.
To Launch in 2003 Re-evaluate zoning decisions on a regular basis to ensure decisions are achieving results.
Planning Planning is working on targeted zoning changes to respond to changing conditions (a few specific areas include Lower Manhattan, Riverdale and sections of Staten Island).
Planning is also examining potential text amendments that remove modest obstacles to new housing development.
To Launch in 2003 Remove municipal uses from the waterfront Planning A new law requires an inventory of uses of waterfront property.
Planning is looking for new sites for non-essential waterfront facilities like the Tow Pound on Pier 79, and the salt piles at East 125th Street on the East River.
To Launch in 2003 Redefine light manufacturing uses that are environmentally safe to commercial so they can co-exist with residential use Planning This is happening through the rezoning of Greenpoint, Wi
